District of Columbia statutes.
44-151.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Assisted living” means an assisted living residence as defined in § 44-102.01(4).

(2)

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(3)

“Continuing care facility” means a building, or complex of buildings under one management at one or more sites, if continuing care services are provided.

(4)

“Continuing care services” means the continuum of care, ranging from independent living to assisted living to nursing home care, provided pursuant to a contract for the life of the individual purchasing the services or for a period of not less than one year.

(5)

“Entrance fee” means a payment that assures a resident a place in a facility for a term of at least a year or for life.

(6)

“Hazardous financial condition” means a provider is insolvent or in imminent danger of becoming insolvent.

(7)

“Independent living” means an individual residing in a continuing care facility’s living unit with no need for specialized health care services beyond general preventative health care.

(8)

“Living unit” means a room, apartment, cottage, or other area within a continuing care facility set aside for the exclusive use or control of one or more identified residents.

(9)

“Nursing home” means a nursing home as defined in § 44-501(3).

(10)

“Provider” means the promoter, developer, or owner, whether a natural person, partnership, or other unincorporated association, however organized, trust, or corporation, whether operated for profit or not, or any other person, that solicits or undertakes to provide continuing care services.

(11)

“Resident” means a purchaser of, a nominee of, or a subscriber to, a continuing care contract.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-270, § 101, 52 DCR 799
This section is referenced in § 31-1201.